Tennessee statutes. Title 26 Execution
Part 4

Executions and Garnishments in Aid of Executions

26-2-401. Applicability.

This part shall apply to executions and garnishments in aid of execution in supplement to other applicable provisions of law; provided, that the contents of the Notice to Judgment Debtor required in connection with a wage garnishment shall be governed by § 26-2-216.

Acts 1988, ch. 934, § 2.

26-2-402. Statement showing address, amount owed.

Upon requesting the issuance of an execution or garnishment, the judgment creditor, or the judgment creditor's agent or attorney, shall file a statement showing the judgment debtor's last known address, the amount owed on the judgment, and the judgment creditor's address for mailing any notice required under this part. If a clerk issues an execution or a garnishment without demand, the clerk shall ascertain such information from the court records. The judgment debtor's last known address as furnished by the judgment creditor or as ascertained by the clerk shall be included on the notice required by § 26-2-204 or by § 26-2-216.

Acts 1988, ch. 934, § 3; 1989, ch. 404, § 3.

26-2-403. Notice required.

No clerk shall issue an execution or garnishment unless it provides the notice required by § 26-2-404 or by § 26-2-216. No clerk shall issue a garnishment unless it also contains the notice required by § 26-2-203.

No sheriff or other officer shall summon a garnishee unless the garnishment provides the notice required by § 26-2-404 or by § 26-2-216, and unless it provides the notice required by § 26-2-203.

Acts 1988, ch. 934, §§ 4, 5.

26-2-404. Contents of notice.

The following notice shall be completed and shall appear in the text of an execution or garnishment or shall be securely attached thereto:

IN THE COURT FOR COUNTY, TENNESSEE Plaintiff, ) vs. ) CASE NO. Defendant. )

NOTICE TO JUDGMENT DEBTORTo collect a judgment against you in this lawsuit, your money or other property has been seized by execution or garnishment. An execution allows the sheriff to sell the property levied upon. A garnishment requires your bank (or other person holding your money or property) to transfer your property to the court or to hold it to satisfy the judgment.

READ THIS CAREFULLY. YOU MAY BE ABLE TO KEEP YOUR MONEY OR PROPERTY OR GET IT BACK.

State and federal laws prevent certain types of money or property from being used to pay a judgment. Such money or property is “exempt.” Examples of exempt money are: Social security benefits, SSI, unemployment benefits, Veterans' benefits, AFDC, and most government pensions. Examples of exempt property are certain health care aids and “tools of trade.” These examples of exempt money and property constitute only a partial list, and you may have other exemptions.

If you think you have exempt money or property that has been seized, you have the right to file a motion with the court clerk's office identified below claiming your exemption and asking for the release or return of your money or property.

You can get a form for filing this motion at the clerk's office below, or the clerk may have supplied such a form on the back of this notice. YOU SHOULD ACT QUICKLY. If you file a motion within twenty (20) days from the date this notice was mailed to you or was given to you, the court must hear and decide your motion promptly, and in no event later than fourteen (14) days from filing. The clerk will notify you of the time, date, and place of the hearing.

IF YOU DO NOT UNDERSTAND YOUR RIGHTS OR HOW TO EXERCISE THEM, YOU MAY WISH TO CONSULT WITH A LAWYER. IF YOU CANNOT AFFORD A LAWYER, YOU MAY BE ELIGIBLE FOR FREE LEGAL ASSISTANCE. The court clerk's office can provide you with forms and with information about legal services in your area, but the clerk cannot give you legal advice.

NAME: (Clerk of Court) (Judgment Debtor)ADDRESS: (Provided by Creditor) TELEPHONE:

GARNISHMENT CALCULATION

The amount of wages withheld in a garnishment depends upon whether the judgment is for child support or alimony or for some other debt. The two (2) ways to calculate the withholding are outlined below. For purposes of these calculations, “fmw” means the federal minimum hourly wage.

ANSWER OF GARNISHEE (Employer) Docket/Case #

[GARNISHMENT CALCULATION: TCA 26-2-404(b), as defined in TCA 26-2-216]

Pay period from to

IF THE JUDGMENT IS FOR ANY DEBT OTHER THAN FOR ALIMONY OR CHILD SUPPORT:

What is total gross pay before any deductions? $ (b)(1)(A)

How much is deducted from pay for social security and federal income tax? (b)(1)(B)

Subtract subdivision (b)(1)(B) from subdivision (b)(1)(A). This is disposable earnings. (b)(1)(C)

Are wages paid once every week, once every two (2) weeks, once a month or two (2) times per month? (fmw = federal minimum hourly wage)

If once every week, enter 30 X fmw. (b)(1)(D)

If once every two (2) weeks, enter 30 X fmw X 2. (b)(1)(D)

If two (2) times per month, enter 30 X fmw X 2.166667. (b)(1)(D)

If once per month, enter 30 X fmw X 4.333334. (b)(1)(D)

Subtract subdivision (b)(1)(D) from subdivision (b)(1)(C). If subdivision (b)(1)(E) is $0 or less, STOP. NO WAGES MAY BE WITHHELD. If subdivision (b)(1)(E) is more than $0, go on to (F). (b)(1)(E)

Divide subdivision (b)(1)(C) by 4. (b)(1)(F)

Enter the lesser of subdivision (b)(1)(E) or subdivision (b)(1)(F). (b)(1)(G)

How many children does the debtor have under sixteen (16) years of age living in Tennessee? (b)(1)(H)

Multiply subdivision (b)(1)(H) by $2.50 per week [$5.00 if wages are paid every two (2) weeks; $5.42 if paid two (2) times a month; and $10.83 if paid once per month]. (b)(1)(I)

Subtract subdivision (b)(1)(I) from subdivision (b)(1)(G). This is the amount of wages to withhold. If this amount is $0 or less, nothing should be withheld from wages. (b)(1)(J)

IF THE JUDGMENT IS FOR CHILD SUPPORT OR ALIMONY:

If the judgment is for alimony and the ex-spouse has remarried, withhold the amount in subdivision (b)(1)(J). $

If the judgment is for child support, or the judgment is for alimony and the ex- spouse has not remarried, multiply disposable earnings (subdivision (b)(1)(C)) by:

— .50 if the employee is supporting another spouse or child and the arrearage is less than twelve (12) weeks old;

— .55 if the employee is supporting another spouse or child and the arrearage is more than twelve (12) weeks old;

— .60 if the employee is NOT supporting another spouse or child and the arrearage is less than twelve (12) weeks old;

— .65 if the employee is NOT supporting another spouse or child and the arrearage is more than twelve (12) weeks old.

Withhold this amount (in preceding blank) from wages, or the amount actually ordered to be paid for alimony or child support, whichever is less .

♦ Nothing due employee

♦ No longer employed

♦ Other

As of the day of , 20 , , Garnishee, is holding the sum of $ .

I certify under penalty of perjury that the above information is true and correct. Date: GARNISHEE/EMPLOYER

Acts 1988, ch. 934, § 6; 1991, ch. 516, § 1; 2008, ch. 695, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of this title to collection of court costs, OAG 99-003, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (1/19/99).

26-2-405. Copy of execution furnished judgment debtor.

A sheriff or other officer who levies an execution upon property of a judgment debtor shall immediately thereafter on that same or next working day provide the judgment debtor with a copy of the execution that describes the property levied upon and with a completed copy of the notice set forth in § 26-2-404 by mailing them first class, postage prepaid, to the judgment debtor at the address provided pursuant to § 26-2-402, or by actual delivery to the judgment debtor.

Acts 1988, ch. 934, § 7.

26-2-406. Mailing of garnishment to judgment debtor.

A sheriff or other officer who summons a garnishee shall provide the garnishee with three (3) copies of the garnishment summons providing the completed notice required by § 26-2-404 or by § 26-2-216, whichever is applicable. On that same or the next working day, the garnishee shall determine if such garnishee possesses or controls money or property of the judgment debtor; and if so, within that same time period shall furnish a copy of the garnishment summons and notice by mailing them first class, postage prepaid, to the judgment debtor's last known address as shown by the garnishee's records, or by actual delivery to the judgment debtor. If the address as shown by the garnishee's records differs from that provided by the creditor as shown on the bottom of the completed notice, the garnishee shall also mail a copy of the garnishment and notice to the judgment debtor at the latter address by first class mail, postage prepaid.

Acts 1988, ch. 934, § 8.

26-2-407. Motion to quash execution or garnishment.

A judgment debtor may assert exemption rights after the service of an execution or garnishment by filing a motion to quash the garnishment or execution. The motion to quash must be filed within the following time periods:

Twenty (20) days from the mailing of the notice required by § 26-2-404 in the event of a levy of execution;

Twenty (20) days from the withholding of wages by a garnishee/employer pursuant to a wage garnishment; and

With respect to any other garnishment, twenty (20) days from the mailing of the notice required by § 26-2-404 pursuant to that garnishment.

Acts 1988, ch. 934, § 9.

Attorney General Opinions. Assertion of exemption rights, OAG 89-10, 1989 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/31/89).

Effect of this section on § 26-2-114, OAG 90-89, 1990 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (10/1/90).

26-2-408. Property determined to be exempt.

No sheriff or other officer shall conduct an execution sale, and no clerk shall pay out funds received pursuant to an execution or garnishment until the judgment debtor's time has expired for filing a motion to quash, or until a judicial determination has been made on such motion. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the ability of the judgment creditor and the judgment debtor to resolve by agreed order the judgment debtor's motion asserting exemption rights. When property has been determined to be exempt by agreement or by judicial determination, the property shall be immediately released to the judgment debtor.

Acts 1988, ch. 934, § 10.

Attorney General Opinions. Assertion of exemption rights, OAG 89-10, 1989 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/31/89).

26-2-409. Copies of forms to be furnished.

The University of Tennessee county technical assistance service shall provide clerks of court with forms for judgment debtors to use in filing a motion to quash an execution or garnishment on the ground of exemption rights, in otherwise asserting their exemption rights, or in filing a motion to pay a judgment by installments. Clerks shall provide a copy of these forms to judgment debtors upon request. Nothing herein shall be construed as prohibiting clerks from printing an appropriate form motion to quash on the reverse side of the notices required by §§ 26-2-404 and 26-2-216, so that the judgment debtor may assert applicable exemption rights.

Acts 1988, ch. 934, § 11.

26-2-410. Hearing on exemptions — Notice.

Upon the filing of a motion to quash or other motion claiming exemption rights by the judgment debtor, the clerk shall immediately schedule a hearing on the motion. The court shall conduct the hearing and adjudicate the matter promptly, and in no event later than fourteen (14) days from the filing of the motion. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the ability of judges to interchange with each other as provided in title 17, chapter 2. The clerk shall provide reasonable notice to the judgment debtor and creditor of the time, date, and place of hearing.

Acts 1988, ch. 934, § 12.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of this title to collection of court costs, OAG 99-003, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (1/19/99).